Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.079

Making small loans—Agent for a licensee or exempt entity—Federal preemption.

A person may not engage in the business of making small loans as an agent for a licensee or exempt entity without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check casher or check seller license under this chapter. An agent of a licensee or exempt entity engaged in the business of making small loans is subject to this chapter. To the extent that federal law preempts the applicability of any part of this chapter, all other parts of this chapter remain in effect.

[ 2003 c 86 s 10.]